Washington statutes.
RCW 36.54.015

Ferries—Fourteen year long range improvement plan—Contents.

The legislative authority of every county operating ferries shall prepare, with the advice and assistance of the county engineer, a fourteen year long range capital improvement plan embracing all major elements of the ferry system. Such plan shall include a listing of each major element of the system showing its estimated current value, its estimated replacement cost, and its amortization period.

[ 1975 1st ex.s. c 21 s 2.]